Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1477.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 5-132, as
last amended by Section 1, Chapter 296, O.S.L. 2025 (70 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 5-132), is amended to read as follows:
Section 5-132. A. Any person lawfully present in the United
States and who is of legal age and a resident of this state, over
the age of twenty-one (21) and under the age of thirty (30), except
as provided for concurrent enrollment in Section 628.13 of this
title, and who has not completed the twelfth grade in school shall
be given the same educational privileges and opportunities provided
by law for children over the age of five (5) and under the age of
twenty-one (21), upon submitting to the board of education of the
school district in which the person resides, or the board’s
designee, evidence satisfactory to that board showing that during
the time before he or she was age twenty-one (21) he or she was

unable to attend school for a definite period or periods of time, by
reason whereof it was impossible for him or her to complete the
twelfth grade before reaching the age of twenty-one (21). Provided
further, the pupil shall be counted in the average daily attendance
of the district where he or she attends school during the period of
time provided for in this section for the purpose of calculating
State Aid for the district. Provided that, beginning in the 2025-
2026 school year, persons applying for and approved to attend school
in accordance with the provisions of this subsection shall only be
eligible if such district offers a full-time virtual education
program and such persons only utilize the full-time virtual
education program option for the completion of their high school
education.
B. Any resident of the state who is age nineteen (19) or older,
who is not enrolled in any high school program, and who has not
completed the twelfth grade may attend any adult high school
completion program which is established by a school district and
approved by the State Board of Career and Technology Education if
such attendance has the approval of the district offering the
program. Such attendance shall not be counted in the average daily
attendance of the district unless the Legislature appropriates
monies for adult high school completion programs. Such attendance
shall not be counted to meet minimum numbers for accreditation of
the school district involved, and such students shall not attend
classes which that are a part of the normal class structure of the
district.
C. A person subject to the provisions of subsection A or B of
this section shall not be required to take the student assessments
required by Section 1210.508 of this title and shall not be included
in the reports required by Section 1210.545 or 24-120.1 of this
title.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 628.13, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 628.13. A. 1. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education, in cooperation with the State Board of Education, shall
actively encourage the concurrent enrollment in college or
university courses of eligible high school students on high school
ENR. S. B. NO. 1477 Page 2

campuses, on college and university campuses, and via online
courses.
2. The State Regents and State Board shall establish concurrent
enrollment requirements with an emphasis on determining course
readiness and take all necessary actions to ensure the availability
of concurrent enrollment opportunities to students in all Oklahoma
high schools in this state.
B. The State Board of Education in cooperation with the
Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall prepare
promotional materials explaining the requirements, features, and
opportunities of concurrent enrollment and shall ensure that the
independent school districts distribute the materials to each
student prior to enrollment for each year of high school.
C. No institution of The Oklahoma State System of Higher
Education shall deny enrollment in any course to any otherwise
eligible high school student, or a student of who is at least
thirteen (13) years of age but not twenty-one (21) years of age or
older who is receiving high-school-level instruction at home, who
meets the requirements of concurrent enrollment, nor shall any
independent school district prohibit any student who meets the
requirements of concurrent enrollment from participating if the
student is at least thirteen (13) years of age but not twenty-one
(21) years of age or older.
D. 1. Each high school senior who meets the eligibility
requirements for concurrent enrollment shall be entitled to receive
a tuition waiver equivalent to the amount of resident tuition for a
maximum of eighteen (18) credit hours in their his or her senior
year.
2. Subject to the high school senior concurrent enrollment
program being fully funded, each high school junior who meets the
eligibility requirements for concurrent enrollment shall be entitled
to receive a tuition waiver equivalent to the amount of resident
tuition for a maximum of nine (9) credit hours in their his or her
junior year, subject to the availability of funds.
3. Tuition waivers provided pursuant to this section shall be
granted without any limitation on the number of waivers granted in
ENR. S. B. NO. 1477 Page 3

any year other than the amount of funds available for the program
and the number of eligible applicants.
E. When a student earns college credit through concurrent
enrollment, school districts shall provide academic credit for any
concurrently enrolled higher education courses that are correlated
with the academic credit awarded by the institution of higher
education. Academic credit shall only be transcripted as elective
credit if there is no correlation between the concurrent enrollment
higher education course and a course provided by the school
district.
F. On or before December 1 of each year, the Oklahoma State
Regents for Higher Education shall issue an annual report on the
concurrent enrollment program implemented pursuant to this section.
The annual report shall include, but not be limited to, the
following information:
1. The number of students participating in concurrent
enrollment;
2. The number of students participating in concurrent
enrollment who received tuition waivers pursuant to subsection D of
this section;
3. The high school graduation rate of students described in
paragraphs 1 and 2 of this subsection; and
4. The number of students described in paragraphs 1 and 2 of
this subsection who earned an associate’s degree or a bachelor’s
degree at an institution of higher education.
The annual report shall be posted on the websites of the
Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education and the State Department
of Education.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1477 Page 4

Passed the Senate the 16th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 28th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1477 Page 5